Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 420.005 is amended to read:
420.005. As used in ORS  420.005 to 420.048, 420.060 to 420.275, 420.810 to 420.840, 420.905 to
420.915 and 420A.300 to 420A.315, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Adjudicated youth” has the meaning given that term in ORS 419A.004.
(2) “Design capacity” means the number of adjudicated youths or other persons a youth cor-
rection facility is able to hold based on applicable safety codes and standards.
(3) “Director” means the Director of the Oregon Youth Authority.
(4) “Youth” has the meaning given that term in ORS 419A.004.
[(4)] (5) “Youth authority” means the Oregon Youth Authority.
[(5)] (6)  “Youth correction facility” means a facility used for the confinement  of adjudicated
youths and other persons placed in the legal or physical  custody of the youth authority and includes
secure regional youth facilities, regional youth  accountability camps, regional residential academies
and satellites, camps and branches of those facilities.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 420.017 is amended to read:
420.017. (1) The Oregon Youth Authority shall work collaboratively with the  juvenile depart-
ments to divert youths and adjudicated youths from commitment  to [ the] youth correction facilities
to alternative community services.
(2) The juvenile departments shall develop [ a plan ] local diversion plans  for services needed
to divert the commitment of [ youth] youths and adjudicated youths  from  [ the] youth correction
facilities, and how  these services are to be administered if funds are provided. [ The] A local di-
version plan must include the process the juvenile  [ departments] department  will use to provide
hearings officers and to conduct preliminary parole revocation hearings.
(3) The youth authority shall administer and  coordinate [ the] local juvenile diversion plans and
plans for juvenile crime prevention basic services , as described by the youth authority  by rule,
with county juvenile departments.  Juvenile crime prevention basic services may [ be used for ] in-
clude detention and other juvenile department services.
(4) The youth  authority, in consultation with county juvenile departments and the Youth De-
velopment Division, shall adopt rules to coordinate and align  the high-risk juvenile crime prevention
plans developed under ORS 417.855[,] and the juvenile  diversion plans and [ the] plans for juvenile
crime prevention basic services  described in this section .
Enrolled Senate Bill 816 (SB 816-INTRO) Page 1
SECTION 3.  ORS 420.019 is amended to read:
420.019. (1)(a)  The Oregon Youth Authority may contract with the governing body of a county
or two or more counties, if the counties  have joined together as a consortium or region, for imple-
menting the diversion plan described in ORS 420.017.
(b) A county or counties that contract  with the Oregon Youth Authority under this section shall
have access to a continuum of out-of-home placement options including, but  not limited to, youth
correction facilities and substitute care placements, as defined by the youth authority by rule.
(c) The state and  county may agree that the governing body of the county or counties may
subcontract for services or that the state will provide services or that  the county or counties may
subcontract for some services and the state provide other  services as stipulated in the contract with
the youth authority.
(d) The youth authority is responsible for providing financial oversight and  administration of
contracts and financial oversight of subcontracts.
(e) The funds provided to implement the  diversion plan or provide for out-of-home placement
may not be used by a county to supplant moneys otherwise provided to  the county juvenile depart-
ment for services to  youths and  adjudicated [ youth] youths .
(2)(a) The Oregon Youth Authority shall enter into intergovernmental agreements  with a county
or, if the counties have joined together as a consortium or  region, two or more counties to delineate
specific duties necessary to carry out the diversion plan described in ORS 420.017.
(b) The intergovernmental  agreement must define the responsibilities of the youth authority and
the county or counties and support the mission of the youth authority and the county  or counties,
taking into consideration public safety, equitable services for youths and  adjudicated youths and
counties, geographic considerations and staffing and funding levels  for the youth authority and the
county or counties.
(c) The intergovernmental agreement may authorize the performance or transfer of  probation
and parole services between the youth authority and the county or counties.
(3) The Oregon Youth Authority shall adopt rules, in consultation  with the county juvenile de-
partments, to ensure equitable  access to a continuum of out-of-home placement options among con-
tracting counties and to develop performance metrics for the diversion plans.
Passed by Senate March 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 816 (SB 816-INTRO) Page 2